Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.070

Vice president.

The commissioner of finance and accounting shall be vice president of the commission. In the absence or inability of the mayor, he or she shall perform the duties of president.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2015; 1965 c 7 s 35.17.070. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 15, part; RRS s 9104, part.]